Utah statutes.
34A-1-408.   Investigations through representatives.

(1)  For the purpose of making any investigation necessary for the implementation of this title with regard to any employment or place of employment, the commission may appoint, in writing, any competent person who is a resident of the state, as an agent, whose duties shall be prescribed in the written appointment.

(2)  In the discharge of the agent's duties, the agent shall have:

(a)  every power of investigation granted in this title to the commission; and

(b)  the same powers as a referee appointed by a district court with regard to taking evidence.

(3)  The commission may:

(a)  conduct any number of the investigations contemporaneously through different agents; and

(b)  delegate to the agents the taking of evidence bearing upon any investigation or hearing.

(4)  The recommendations made by the agents shall be advisory only and shall not preclude the taking of further evidence or further investigation if the commission so orders.

